Utah statutes.
32B-11-206.   Duties of commission and department before issuing manufacturing license.

(1) (a)  Before the commission may issue a manufacturing license, the department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings to gather information and make recommendations to the commission as to whether a manufacturing license should be issued.

(b)  The department shall forward to the commission the information and recommendations under Subsection (1)(a) to aid in the commission's determination.

(2)  Before issuing a manufacturing license, the commission shall:

(a)  determine that the person filed a complete application and is in compliance with:

(i)  Sections 32B-11-203 and 32B-11-205; and

(ii)  the relevant part under this chapter for the specific type of manufacturing license;

(b)  determine that the person is not disqualified under Section 32B-1-304;

(c)  consider the physical characteristics of the premises where an alcoholic product is proposed to be stored, mixed, or manufactured such as:

(i)  condition of the premises; and

(ii)  safety and security considerations;

(d)  consider the person's ability to properly use the manufacturing license within the requirements of this title and the commission rules including:

(i)  manufacturing capacity;

(ii)  extent of product distribution; and

(iii)  the nature and type of entity making use of the manufacturing license;

(e)  consider any special factor as provided in this chapter that may be unique to the specific type of manufacturing license sought by the person;

(f)  approve of the location and equipment used by the person to manufacture an alcoholic product; and

(g)  consider any other factor the commission considers necessary.

